Louisiana, session 2026, HB869.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1028.7 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1028.7. Required coverage for injectable drugs to improve glucose levels or for
weight loss
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Body mass index" means a practical marker used to assess the degree
of obesity, calculated by dividing the weight in kilograms by the height in meters
squared.
(2) "Health coverage plan" means any hospital, health, or medical expense
insurance policy, hospital or medical service contract, employee welfare benefit plan,
contract, or other agreement with a health maintenance organization or a preferred
provider organization, health and accident insurance policy, or any other insurance
contract of this type in this state, including a group insurance plan, self-insurance
plan, and the Office of Group Benefits programs. "Health coverage plan" does not
include a plan providing coverage for excepted benefits defined in R.S. 22:1061,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-43 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 869
limited benefit health insurance plans, and short-term policies that have a term of
less than twelve months.
(3) "Injectable drug" means a drug approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration for use to lower glucose levels or for weight loss.
(4) "Obesity" means a body mass index equal to or greater than thirty
kilograms per meter squared.
B.(1) A health coverage plan renewed, delivered, or issued for delivery in
this state shall not deny coverage for an injectable drug to lower glucose levels or for
weight loss if all of the following apply:
(a) The injectable drug has been approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration for use to lower glucose levels or for weight loss.
(b) The drug is prescribed by a licensed healthcare provider for the treatment
of prediabetes, gestational diabetes, or obesity when a covered person is diagnosed
or has been previously diagnosed with prediabetes, gestational diabetes, or obesity,
and the drug is medically necessary for the treatment of this disease or condition.
(c) The drug is on the insurer's formulary or preferred drug list, if any.
(2) The coverage provided in this Section may be subject to annual
deductibles, coinsurance, and copayment provisions as are consistent with those
established under the health coverage plan and may be subject to prior authorization.
(3) A health coverage plan may include a provision that an injectable drug
used for the treatment of prediabetes, gestational diabetes, or obesity continue to be
medically necessary as certified by the treating healthcare provider.
(4) A health coverage plan may include a provision that a covered person
shall participate in a lifestyle management plan administered by the health coverage
plan, if available.
Section 2. This Act shall apply to any new policy, contract, program, or health
coverage plan issued on and after January 1, 2026. Any policy, contract, or health coverage
plan in effect prior to January 1, 2026, shall convert to conform to this Act on or before the
renewal date, but no later than January 1, 2027.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-43 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 869
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of
Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by this legislature, this Act
shall become effective on the day following such approval.